Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.291

State lottery exemption.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the conducting, operating, participating, or selling or purchasing of tickets or shares in the "lottery" or "state lottery" as defined in RCW 67.70.010 when such conducting, operating, participating, or selling or purchasing is in conformity to the provisions of chapter 67.70 RCW and to the rules adopted thereunder.

[ 1982 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 39.]

NOTES:

Construction—1982 2nd ex.s. c 7: See RCW 67.70.902.